Maryland, session 2025, HB1523.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1523*

HOUSE BILL 1523
Article 14 – Howard County
20.400.
(a) Howard County may impose, by law, and collect a sales or use tax on room
rentals in the county for sleeping accommodations for transients.
(b) (1) The rate of the tax authorized under this section may not exceed [seven]
EIGHT percent.
(2) Subject to the annual County budget and appropriation process, the
County shall distribute any revenue attributable to a tax rate greater than five percent
BUT NOT GREATER THAN SEVEN PERCENT imposed by the County under this subsection
as follows:
(i) Two–thirds to the Howard County Tourism Council; and
(ii) One–third to the Howard County Economic Development
Authority.
(3) SUBJECT TO THE ANNUAL COUNTY BUDGET AND APPROPRIATION
PROCESS, THE COUNTY SHALL DISTRIBUTE ANY REVENUE ATTRIBUTABLE TO A TAX
RATE GREATER THAN SEVEN PERCENT IMPOSED BY THE COUNTY UNDER THIS
SUBSECTION TO THE HOWARD COUNTY TOURISM COUNCIL.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.